es: Clase de ancho de tabla de snowboard: Medio ancha; Estrecha; Regular; Volumen desplazado; Ancha; Otro
pl: Klasa szerokości deski snowboardowej: Średnio szeroki; Wąski; Standardowy; O zwiększonej objętości (volume-shifted); Szeroki; Inny
el: Κατηγορία πλάτους σνόουμπορντ: Μεσαίο-φαρδύ; Στενό; Κανονικό; Μετατοπισμένου όγκου (Volume-shifted); Φαρδύ; Άλλο
it: Classe di larghezza snowboard: Medio-larga; Stretta; Regolare; Volume-shifted; Larga; Altra
cs: Třída šířky snowboardu: Středně široký; Úzký; Běžný; Posunutý objem; Široký; Jiné
ro-RO: Clasă de lățime a snowboardului: Mediu-lat; Îngust; Standard; Cu volum deplasat; Lat; Altele
ja: スノーボード幅クラス: ミッドワイド; ナロー; レギュラー; ボリュームシフト; ワイド; その他
tr: Snowboard genişlik sınıfı: Orta geniş; Dar; Normal; Hacim kaydırmalı; Geniş; Diğer
sk-SK: Šírková kategória snowboardu: Stredne široké; Úzke; Štandardné; S posunutým objemom; Široké; Iné
pt-PT: Classe de largura da prancha de snowboard: Média-larga; Estreita; Regular; Volume deslocado; Larga; Outra
ru: Класс ширины сноуборда: Средне-широкий; Узкий; Стандартный; Со смещённым объёмом; Широкий; Другое
hu: Snowboard szélességi osztálya: Közepesen széles; Keskeny; Normál; Szélesített (Volume-shifted); Széles; Egyéb
zh-TW: 滑雪板寬度等級: 中等偏寬; 窄板; 標準; 容積轉移; 寬板; 其他
hr-HR: Klasa širine snowboarda: Srednje široko; Usko; Standardno; Promijenjen volumen (Volume-shifted); Široko; Ostalo
fi: Lumilaudan leveysluokka: Keskileveä; Kapea; Normaali; Tilavuusoptimoitu; Leveä; Muu
fr: Catégorie de largeur du snowboard: Mi-large; Étroit; Standard; À volume décalé; Large; Autre
zh-CN: 单板滑雪板宽度等级: 中宽; 窄; 常规; 短宽型; 宽; 其他
de: Snowboardbreitenklasse: Mid-Wide; Narrow; Regular; Volume-Shifted; Wide; Andere
en: Snowboard width class: Mid-wide; Narrow; Regular; Volume-shifted; Wide; Other
sl-SI: Razred širine deske za sneg: Srednje široka; Ozka; Običajna; Zamaknjena prostornina; Široka; Druga
lt-LT: Snieglentės pločio klasė: Vidutiniškai plati; Siaura; Įprasta; Su paskirstytu tūriu; Plati; Kita
nl: Snowboard breedteklasse: Mid-wide; Smal; Regular; Volume-shifted; Wide; Anders
pt-BR: Snowboard largura classe: Média-larga; Estreita; Normal; Volume deslocado; Larga; Outra
nb: Snowboard-breddeklasse: Middels bred; Smal; Standard; Volumforskjøvet; Bred; Annet
th: บอร์ดสโนว์บอร์ด คลาสความกว้าง: กว้างปานกลาง; แคบ; ปกติ; เน้นปริมาตร; กว้าง; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Клас ширина на сноуборд: Средноширока; Тясна; Стандартна; С изместен обем; Широка; Друго
da: Snowboardbreddeklasse: Mid-wide; Smal; Almindelig; Volume-shifted; Bred; Andet
ko: 스노보드 너비 등급: 미드 와이드; 내로우; 레귤러; 볼륨 시프트; 와이드; 기타
sv: Snowboard – breddklass: Mid-wide; Smal; Standard; Volume-shifted; Wide; Övrigt
vi: Lớp chiều rộng ván trượt tuyết: Rộng vừa; Hẹp; Thông thường; Dịch chuyển thể tích; Rộng; Khác